Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.100

Fiscal agent for state—Duties of fiscal agent.

The fiscal agent of the state shall receive all moneys due the state from any other state or from the federal government, take all necessary steps for the collection thereof, and apply the same to the funds to which they belong. He or she shall collect from time to time all moneys that may accrue to the state by virtue of section 13 of the enabling act, or from any other source not otherwise provided for by law.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5041; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.100. Prior: (i) 1891 c 138 s 2; RRS s 5485. (ii) 1891 c 138 s 4; RRS s 5487.]